Connecticut, session 2026, HB05432.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 52-257 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The fees of parties in civil actions in which the matter in demand
is not less than fifteen thousand dollars shall be: For each complaint,
exclusive of signing and bond, five dollars for the first page and, for each
succeeding page, two dollars; for each judgment file, two dollars for the
first page and, for each additional page, one dollar and fifty cents. The
prevailing party in any such civil action shall receive, by way of
indemnity, the following sums: (1) For all proceedings before trial, fifty
dollars; (2) for the trial of an issue of law or fact, seventy-five dollars,
but if more than one issue of fact is tried at one time, only one trial fee
shall be allowed; and (3) in difficult or extraordinary cases in the
Superior Court, where a defense has been interposed, a further
allowance, in the discretion of the court, not to exceed two hundred
HB5432 / File No. 535 1

HB5432 File No. 535
dollars.
(b) Parties shall also receive: (1) For each witness attending court, the
witness' legal fee and mileage; (2) for each deposition taken out of the
state, forty dollars, and for each deposition within the state, thirty
dollars; (3) on an application for the sale of property attached, the
expenses incurred; (4) in any civil action affecting the title to real
property situated in this state, or affecting any mortgage or lien thereon,
the actual expense [, not exceeding the sum of two hundred twenty-five
dollars,] of an examination of the land records concerning the title to the
real property in question and such amount as the court or judge
determines to be reasonable for the services of an expert on the value of
the land when such value is in dispute; (5) for maps, plans, mechanical
drawings and photographs, necessary or convenient in the trial of any
action, a reasonable sum; (6) for copies of records used in evidence,
bonds, recognizances and subpoenas, court and clerk's fees; (7) for the
signing and service of process, the legal fees payable therefor, except
that a fee shall not be allowed for the return of a subpoena to court; (8)
the actual expense incurred in publishing orders of notice under
direction of the court; (9) for each interpreter necessarily employed in
the trial of any civil action, twenty dollars per diem; (10) for premiums
upon all bonds or undertakings provided pursuant to statute, rule of
court, order of court or stipulation of parties, including bonds in lieu of
or in release or dissolution of attachment, the actual amount paid, not
exceeding a reasonable amount; (11) documented investigative costs
and expenses, not exceeding the sum of two hundred dollars; and (12)
for the recording, videotaping, transcribing and presentation of the
deposition of a practitioner of the healing arts, as defined in section 20-
1, dentist, registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse or
licensed practical nurse, as defined in section 20-87a, or real estate
appraiser that is used in lieu of live testimony in the civil action, the
reasonable expenses incurred.
(c) In all civil actions in which the matter in demand is less than
fifteen thousand dollars, the prevailing party shall receive, by way of
indemnity, the following sums: (1) For all proceedings before trial, ten
HB5432 / File No. 535 2

HB5432 File No. 535
dollars; and (2) for the trial of an issue of fact or law, fifteen dollars, but,
if more than one issue of fact or law is tried at one time, only one trial
fee shall be allowed.
(d) The following sums may be allowed to the prevailing party in
causes on appeal, in the discretion of the court: (1) For all proceedings,
one hundred dollars; (2) for expenses actually incurred in printing or
photoduplicating copies of briefs, a sum not exceeding two hundred
dollars; and (3) to the plaintiff in error, plaintiff in a cause reserved, or
appellant, as the case may be, the record fee, provided judgment shall
be rendered in his favor. Such costs in the Superior Court in appealed
causes and in the Supreme Court or Appellate Court shall be in the
discretion of the court on reservation of a cause for advice, or when a
new trial is granted.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not interfere with the discretion
of the court in taxing costs in actions in which equitable relief is
demanded.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 52-257
JUD Joint Favorable
HB5432 / File No. 535 3

HB5432 File No. 535
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
This bill affects private parties and does not result in a fiscal impact
to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5432 / File No. 535 4

HB5432 File No. 535
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5432
AN ACT CONCERNING THE RECEIPT OF FEES BY A PARTY TO A
CIVIL ACTION AFFECTING TITLE TO REAL PROPERTY.